California, session 20252026, SB724.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 116886 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:116886. (a)A public water system, including community water systems and noncommunity water systems, that provides service to residents of The owner of a public housing unit that is owned or managed by a city, county, city and county, or city, county, or city and county housing authority, shall provide information to those the residents of the public housing unit regarding any applicable existing program that offers free testing of the water for lead.(b)For purposes of this section, noncommunity water system has the same meaning as in Section 116275.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.